Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-420
Hearing officer; requirements.

Any hearing required or permitted for juveniles in the custody of the Office of Juvenile Services shall be conducted by a hearing officer who is an attorney licensed to practice law in the State of Nebraska and may be an employee of the Department of Health and Human Services or an attorney who is an independent contractor. If the hearing officer is an employee of the department, he or she shall not be assigned to any duties requiring him or her to give ongoing legal advice to any person employed by or who is a contractor with the office.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 52;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 40;

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 10.